Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.13.240

Share restrictions.

(1) The corporation may restrict the transfer of uncertificated shares from the date the demand for payment under RCW 23B.13.230 is received until the proposed corporate action is effected or the restriction is released under RCW 23B.13.260.

(2) The person for whom dissenters' rights are asserted as to uncertificated shares retains all other rights of a shareholder until the effective date of the proposed corporate action.

[ 2009 c 189 s 45; 1989 c 165 s 147.]